Maryland, session 2026, HB1063.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Natural Resources
10–206.
(A) The Department may reduce the wildlife population in any county, election
district, or other identifiable area of the State after a thorough investigation reveals that
protected wildlife is seriously injurious to agricultural or other interests in the affected
area. The method of reducing the wildlife population is at the Department’s discretion,
except that trapping is preferred whenever feasible. The Department shall dispose of
wildlife taken pursuant to the provisions of this section as the Department deems
advisable.
(B) (1) IN THIS SUBSECTION, “DEER DAMAGE” INCLUDES:
(I) WIDESPREAD DAMAGE CAUSED BY DEER, INCLUDING THE
ELIMINATION OF FOREST UNDERSTORY, TREE REGENERATION, AND NATIVE
PLANTS; AND
(II) THE DESTRUCTION OF AGRICULTURAL CROPS OR
LANDSCAPING, INCLUDING ORNAMENTAL LANDSCAPING, CAUSED BY DEER.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT MAY AUTHORIZE THE REDUCTION OF THE
DEER POPULATION ON ANY SINGLE, CONTIGUOUS PROPERTY OF AT LEAST 10 ACRES
WHERE THE DEPARTMENT HAS DOCUMENTED DEER DAMAGE.
(3) (I) THE METHOD OF REDUCING THE DEER POPULATION:

HOUSE BILL 1063 3
1. IS AT THE DEPARTMENT’S DISCRETION; AND
2. SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, MAY INCLUDE THE ISSUANCE OF A PERMIT TO A PROPERTY OWNER, OR
THE PROPERTY OWNER’S EMPLOYEE, LESSEE, OR AGENT, TO SHOOT DEER ON THE
PROPERTY ON SUNDAYS.
(II) A PERMIT ISSUED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I)2 OF THIS
PARAGRAPH SHALL:
1. MAY NOT AUTHORIZE HUNTING ON SUNDAYS IN:
A. BALTIMORE CITY;
B. BALTIMORE COUNTY;
C. HOWARD COUNTY; OR
D. PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY; AND
2. SHALL PROHIBIT DEER HUNTING ON SUNDAYS
DURING DEER FIREARMS SEASON WITHIN 25 150 YARDS OF A DEPARTMENT TRAIL
DESIGNATED FOR BICYCLING, HIKING, EQUESTRIAN USE, OR OTHER ACTIVE OR
PASSIVE RECREATIONAL USE.
(4) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(I) MAP AREAS OF THE STATE TO WHICH A PERMIT MAY APPLY
UNDER THIS SUBSECTION; AND
(II) MAKE THE MAPS READILY AVAILABLE TO THE PUBLIC.
10–410.
(a) (1) (i) The Department may allow a person to hunt on each Sunday of
the game bird and game mammal seasons in:
1. Allegany County;
2. Subject to subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph, Calvert
County, from 30 minutes before sunrise until 10:30 a.m.;
3. Subject to subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph, Caroline
County, from 30 minutes before sunrise until 10:30 a.m.;

HOUSE BILL 1063
4. Cecil County;
5. Subject to subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph, Charles
County, from 30 minutes before sunrise until 10:30 a.m.;
6. Subject to subparagraph (iv) of this paragraph, Dorchester
County, from 30 minutes before sunrise until 10:30 a.m.;
7. Garrett County;
8. Subject to subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph, Queen
Anne’s County, from 30 minutes before sunrise until 10:30 a.m.;
9. St. Mary’s County;
10. Subject to subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, Somerset
County, from 30 minutes before sunrise until 10:30 a.m.;
11. Washington County;
12. Subject to subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, Worcester
County, from 30 minutes before sunrise until 10:30 a.m.; and
13. Subject to subparagraph (v) of this paragraph, Wicomico
County, from 30 minutes before sunrise until 10:30 a.m.
(ii) The time restrictions under subparagraph (i)10 and 12 of this
paragraph do not apply:
1. On each Sunday of the deer firearms season; and
2. On the last three Sundays in October and the first two
Sundays in November of the deer bow hunting season.
(iii) The time restrictions under subparagraph (i)2, 3, 5, and 8 of this
paragraph do not apply:
1. On each Sunday during the deer firearms season;
2. On the last three Sundays in October and the first two
Sundays in November during the deer bow hunting season; and
3. On each Sunday of the spring turkey hunting season.
(iv) The time restrictions under subparagraph (i)6 of this paragraph
do not apply:

HOUSE BILL 1063 5
1. On each Sunday of the deer hunting seasons from the first
Sunday in October through the second Sunday in January, inclusive; and
2. On each Sunday of the spring turkey hunting season.
(v) The time restrictions under subparagraph (i)(13) of this
paragraph do not apply:
1. A. On the first Sunday of the deer firearms season; and
B. ON THE REMAINING SUNDAYS OF THE DEER
FIREARMS SEASON, FOR WHICH THE TIME RESTRICTIONS SHALL BE FROM 30
MINUTES BEFORE SUNRISE UNTIL 10:30 A.M. AND FROM 3:00 P.M. UNTIL SUNSET;
AND
2. On the last three Sundays in October and the first two
Sundays in November of the deer bow hunting season.
(2) The Department may allow a person to hunt deer on each Sunday of the
deer hunting seasons from the first Sunday in October through the second Sunday in
January, inclusive, in:
(i) Carroll County; and
(ii) Frederick County.
(3) (i) Subject to subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, the Department
may allow a person to hunt deer on each Sunday of the deer hunting seasons from 30
minutes before sunrise until 10:30 a.m. in:
1. Kent County;
2. Montgomery County; and
3. Talbot County.
(ii) The time restrictions under this paragraph do not apply:
1. To a participant in a junior deer hunt authorized under
this subtitle;
2. A. On one Sunday designated by the Department
during the deer firearms season; AND

HOUSE BILL 1063
B. ON IN KENT COUNTY AND TALBOT COUNTY, ON THE
REMAINING SUNDAYS OF THE DEER FIREARMS SEASON, FOR WHICH THE TIME
RESTRICTIONS SHALL BE FROM 30 MINUTES BEFORE SUNRISE UNTIL 10:30 A.M. AND
FROM 3:00 P.M. UNTIL SUNSET;
3. In Kent County, on each Sunday during the deer bow
hunting season and the deer muzzle loader season;
4. In Montgomery County, on one Sunday designated by the
Department during the deer bow hunting season; and
5. In Talbot County, on the last three Sundays in October
and the first two Sundays in November during the bow hunting season.
(4) The Department may allow a person to hunt deer during the deer
firearms season:
(i) On each Sunday in Harford County; and
(ii) On the first Sunday in Anne Arundel County.
(5) The Department may allow a person to hunt deer during the deer bow
hunting season on:
(i) The last three Sundays in October and the first two Sundays in
November in Harford County; and
(ii) The first Sunday in November in Anne Arundel County.
(6) THE DEPARTMENT MAY ALLOW A PERSON TO HUNT DEER ON
EACH SUNDAY OF THE DEER BOW HUNTING SEASON IN BALTIMORE CITY.
(7) The Department may allow a person to hunt turkey on each Sunday of
the spring turkey hunting season in:
(i) Carroll County;
(ii) Kent County; and
(iii) Talbot County, from 30 minutes before sunrise until 10:30 a.m.
(7) (8) Notwithstanding any other provision of this subtitle, the
Department may allow a person with [a]:

HOUSE BILL 1063 7
(I) A person with a deer management permit ISSUED UNDER §
10–206(A) OF THIS TITLE to shoot deer on any Sunday throughout the year in accordance
with the terms of the permit; AND
(II) A EXCEPT IN BALTIMORE CITY, BALTIMORE COUNTY,
HOWARD COUNTY, AND PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY, A PERSON WITH A DEER
DAMAGE PERMIT ISSUED UNDER § 10–206(B) OF THIS TITLE TO SHOOT DEER ON ANY
SUNDAY THROUGHOUT THE YEAR IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE TERMS OF THE
PERMIT.
(8) (9) The Department may allow a person using a State certified
raptor to hunt game birds or mammals on each Sunday during the open season for the
game birds or mammals.
(9) (10) The Department may allow an unarmed person participating in
an organized fox chase to chase foxes on Sunday.
(10) (11) The Department may allow a person shooting pen–reared game
birds or tower–released flighted mallard ducks to hunt on Sunday at a regulated shooting
ground in accordance with § 10–906 of this title.
(11) (12) The Department may allow a person who is 16 years old or
younger to hunt on Sunday if participating in a junior hunt established by the Department
in accordance with this subtitle.
(12) (13) Except as provided in paragraphs (8) (9) through (10) (11) of this
subsection and subject to paragraph (7) (8) of this subsection, a person may not hunt on
Sunday in:
(i) Baltimore City;
(ii) Baltimore County;
(iii) Howard County; or
(iv) Prince George’s County.
(13) (14) (I) [A person may not] SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II)
OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE DEPARTMENT MAY ALLOW A PERSON TO hunt migratory
game birds on Sunday.
(II) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ALLOW THE FOLLOWING
PERSONS TO HUNT MIGRATORY CANADA GEESE (ATLANTIC POPULATION) ON
SUNDAYS DURING THE OPEN SEASON:

HOUSE BILL 1063
1. JUNIOR HUNTERS;
2. SENIOR HUNTERS;
3. APPRENTICE HUNTERS; AND
4. FULL–TIME STUDENTS WHO HOLD A HUNTING
LICENSE.
(14) (15) A person may not hunt on public land within the State park
system on Sunday.
(15) (16) (i) The Department may not allow a person to hunt on public
land designated for hunting by the Department on Sunday except in:
1. Allegany County;
2. Cecil County;
3. Garrett County;
4. St. Mary’s County;
5. Washington County;
6. Dorchester County, for turkey during the spring turkey
hunting season;
7. Frederick County, for deer from the first Sunday in
October through the second Sunday in January of the following year, inclusive;
8. Subject to subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, Somerset
County, on public land leased to a hunt club from 30 minutes before sunrise until 10:30
a.m.;
9. Subject to subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, Worcester
County, from 30 minutes before sunrise until 10:30 a.m.; and
10. Subject to subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph, Wicomico
County, from 30 minutes before sunrise until 10:30 a.m.
(ii) The time restrictions under subparagraph (i)8 and 9 of this
paragraph do not apply:
1. On each Sunday of the deer firearms season; and

HOUSE BILL 1063 9
2. On the last three Sundays in October and the first two
Sundays in November of the deer bow hunting season.
(iii) The time restrictions under subparagraph (i)10 of this paragraph
do not apply:
1. A. On the first Sunday of the deer firearms season; and
B. ON THE REMAINING SUNDAYS OF THE DEER
FIREARMS SEASON, FOR WHICH THE TIME RESTRICTIONS SHALL BE FROM 30
MINUTES BEFORE SUNRISE UNTIL 10:30 A.M. AND FROM 3:00 P.M. UNTIL SUNSET;
AND
2. On the last three Sundays in October and the first two
Sundays in November of the deer bow hunting season.
10–906.
(b) (3) (i) As part of the application for a regulated shooting ground permit,
a person may apply to the Department for authorization to allow hunting on Sunday as
provided under [§ 10–410(a)(10)] § 10–410(A)(11) of this title.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Natural Resources
10–410.
(a) [(1) (i) The Department may allow a person to hunt on each Sunday of
the game bird and game mammal seasons in:
1. Allegany County;
2. Subject to subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph, Calvert
County, from 30 minutes before sunrise until 10:30 a.m.;
3. Subject to subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph, Caroline
County, from 30 minutes before sunrise until 10:30 a.m.;
4. Cecil County;
5. Subject to subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph, Charles
County, from 30 minutes before sunrise until 10:30 a.m.;

HOUSE BILL 1063
6. Subject to subparagraph (iv) of this paragraph, Dorchester
County, from 30 minutes before sunrise until 10:30 a.m.;
7. Garrett County;
8. Subject to subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph, Queen
Anne’s County, from 30 minutes before sunrise until 10:30 a.m.;
9. St. Mary’s County;
10. Subject to subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, Somerset
County, from 30 minutes before sunrise until 10:30 a.m.;
11. Washington County;
12. Subject to subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, Worcester
County, from 30 minutes before sunrise until 10:30 a.m.; and
13. Subject to subparagraph (v) of this paragraph, Wicomico
County, from 30 minutes before sunrise until 10:30 a.m.
(ii) The time restrictions under subparagraph (i)10 and 12 of this
paragraph do not apply:
1. On each Sunday of the deer firearms season; and
2. On the last three Sundays in October and the first two
Sundays in November of the deer bow hunting season.
(iii) The time restrictions under subparagraph (i)2, 3, 5, and 8 of this
paragraph do not apply:
1. On each Sunday during the deer firearms season;
2. On the last three Sundays in October and the first two
Sundays in November during the deer bow hunting season; and
3. On each Sunday of the spring turkey hunting season.
(iv) The time restrictions under subparagraph (i)6 of this paragraph
do not apply:
1. On each Sunday of the deer hunting seasons from the first
Sunday in October through the second Sunday in January, inclusive; and
2. On each Sunday of the spring turkey hunting season.

HOUSE BILL 1063 11
(v) The time restrictions under subparagraph (i)(13) of this
paragraph do not apply:
1. A. On the first Sunday of the deer firearms season; and
B. On the remaining Sundays of the deer firearms season, for
which the time restrictions shall be from 30 minutes before sunrise until 10:30 a.m. and
from 3:00 p.m. until sunset; and
2. On the last three Sundays in October and the first two
Sundays in November of the deer bow hunting season.
(2) The Department may allow a person to hunt deer on each Sunday of the
deer hunting seasons from the first Sunday in October through the second Sunday in
January, inclusive, in:
(i) Carroll County; and
(ii) Frederick County.
(3) (i) Subject to subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, the Department
may allow a person to hunt deer on each Sunday of the deer hunting seasons from 30
minutes before sunrise until 10:30 a.m. in:
1. Kent County;
2. Montgomery County; and
3. Talbot County.
(ii) The time restrictions under this paragraph do not apply:
1. To a participant in a junior deer hunt authorized under
this subtitle;
2. A. On one Sunday designated by the Department
during the deer firearms season; and
B. On In Kent County and Talbot County, on the remaining
Sundays of the deer firearms season, for which the time restrictions shall be from 30
minutes before sunrise until 10:30 a.m. and from 3:00 p.m. until sunset;
3. In Kent County, on each Sunday during the deer bow
hunting season and the deer muzzle loader season;
4. In Montgomery County, on one Sunday designated by the
Department during the deer bow hunting season; and

HOUSE BILL 1063
5. In Talbot County, on the last three Sundays in October
and the first two Sundays in November during the bow hunting season.
(4) The Department may allow a person to hunt deer during the deer
firearms season:
(i) On each Sunday in Harford County; and
(ii) On the first Sunday in Anne Arundel County.
(5) The Department may allow a person to hunt deer during the deer bow
hunting season on:
(i) The last three Sundays in October and the first two Sundays in
November in Harford County; and
(ii) The first Sunday in November in Anne Arundel County.
(6) The Department may allow a person to hunt deer on each Sunday of the
deer bow hunting season in Baltimore City.
(7) The Department may allow a person to hunt turkey on each Sunday of
the spring turkey hunting season in:
(i) Carroll County;
(ii) Kent County; and
(iii) Talbot County, from 30 minutes before sunrise until 10:30 a.m.]
(1) (I) SUBJECT TO THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SECTION, THE
DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS ALLOWING PERSONS TO HUNT ON
SUNDAYS DURING THE GAME BIRD AND GAME MAMMAL SEASONS.
(II) THE REGULATIONS ADOPTED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION
SHALL AT A MINIMUM ALLOW SUNDAY HUNTING ON THE HOURS AND DAYS
AUTHORIZED FOR SUNDAY HUNTING BY SPECIES, HUNTING SEASON, AND COUNTY
ON JUNE 30, 2027.
[(7)] [(8)] (2) Notwithstanding any other provision of this subtitle, the
Department may allow a person with:
(i) A person with a deer management permit issued under §
10–206(a) of this title to shoot deer on any Sunday throughout the year in accordance with
the terms of the permit; and

HOUSE BILL 1063 13
(ii) A Except in Baltimore City, Baltimore County, Howard County,
and Prince George’s County, a person with a deer damage permit issued under § 10–206(b)
of this title to shoot deer on any Sunday throughout the year in accordance with the terms
of the permit.
[(8)] [(9)] (3) The Department may allow a person using a State
certified raptor to hunt game birds or mammals on each Sunday during the open season for
the game birds or mammals.
[(9)] [(10)] (4) The Department may allow an unarmed person
participating in an organized fox chase to chase foxes on Sunday.
[(10)] [(11)] (5) The Department may allow a person shooting pen–reared
game birds or tower–released flighted mallard ducks to hunt on Sunday at a regulated
shooting ground in accordance with § 10–906 of this title.
[(11)] [(12)] (6) The Department may allow a person who is 16 years old
or younger to hunt on Sunday if participating in a junior hunt established by the
Department in accordance with this subtitle.
[(12)] [(13)] (7) Except as provided in paragraphs [(8)] [(9)] (3) through
[(10)] [(11)] (5) of this subsection and subject to paragraph [(7)] [(8)] (2) of this subsection,
a person may not hunt on Sunday in:
(i) Baltimore City;
(ii) Baltimore County;
(iii) Howard County; or
(iv) Prince George’s County.
[(13)] [(14)] (8) (i) Subject to subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, the
Department may allow a person to A person may not hunt migratory game birds on Sunday.
(ii) The Department shall allow the following persons to hunt
migratory Canada geese (Atlantic population) on Sundays during the open season:
1. Junior hunters;
2. Senior hunters;
3. Apprentice hunters; and
4. Full–time students who hold a hunting license.

HOUSE BILL 1063
[(14)] [(15)] (9) A person may not hunt on public land within the State
park system on Sunday.
[(15) (16) (i) The Department may not allow a person to hunt on public
land designated for hunting by the Department on Sunday except in:
1. Allegany County;
2. Cecil County;
3. Garrett County;
4. St. Mary’s County;
5. Washington County;
6. Dorchester County, for turkey during the spring turkey
hunting season;
7. Frederick County, for deer from the first Sunday in
October through the second Sunday in January of the following year, inclusive;
8. Subject to subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, Somerset
County, on public land leased to a hunt club from 30 minutes before sunrise until 10:30
a.m.;
9. Subject to subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, Worcester
County, from 30 minutes before sunrise until 10:30 a.m.; and
10. Subject to subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph, Wicomico
County, from 30 minutes before sunrise until 10:30 a.m.
(ii) The time restrictions under subparagraph (i)8 and 9 of this
paragraph do not apply:
1. On each Sunday of the deer firearms season; and
2. On the last three Sundays in October and the first two
Sundays in November of the deer bow hunting season.
(iii) The time restrictions under subparagraph (i)10 of this paragraph
do not apply:
1. A. On the first Sunday of the deer firearms season; and

HOUSE BILL 1063 15
B. On the remaining Sundays of the deer firearms season, for
which the time restrictions shall be from 30 minutes before sunrise until 10:30 a.m. and
from 3:00 p.m. until sunset; and
2. On the last three Sundays in October and the first two
Sundays in November of the deer bow hunting season.]
10–906.
(b) (3) (i) As part of the application for a regulated shooting ground permit,
a person may apply to the Department for authorization to allow hunting on Sunday as
provided under [§ 10–410(a)(11)] § 10–410(A)(5) of this title.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before December 1,
2029, the Department of Natural Resources shall:
(1) report to the General Assembly, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the
State Government Article, on the effectiveness of this Act on deer management and
balancing stakeholder interests; and
(2) include in the report:
(i) input from all relevant stakeholders;
(ii) a summary of all relevant safety statistics from the Department;
and
(iii) a summary of any regulations adopted in accordance with §
10–401(a)(1) of the Natural Resources Article, as enacted by Section 2 of this Act, during the
reporting period.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act may not be construed
to authorize the Department of Natural Resources to allow Sunday hunting in Baltimore
County, Howard County, or Prince George’s County:
(1) (i) except as provided in Section 10–410(a)(9) through (11) of the
Natural Resources Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act; and
(ii) subject to Section 10–410(a)(8) of the Natural Resources Article,
as enacted by Section 1 of this Act; or
(2) (i) except as provided in Section 10–410(a)(3) through (5) of the
Natural Resources Article, as enacted by Section 2 of this Act; and
(ii) subject to Section 10–410(a)(2) of the Natural Resources Article,
as enacted by Section 2 of this Act.

HOUSE BILL 1063
SECTION 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 2 of this Act shall take
effect July 1, 2027. It shall remain effective for a period of 3 years and, at the end of June
30, 2030, Section 2 of this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly,
shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect.
SECTION 5. 6. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, except as provided in
Section 4 5 of this Act, this Act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.